District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4715

Prohibited activities—Discriminations.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1174, ch. 672, ch. V, § 15
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 126(a), 48 DCR 1225
redesignated § 301, Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 20(b), 49 DCR 8140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-520.
1973 Ed., § 35-715.